Hawaii, session 2026, SB618.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 235-17, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (i) to read as follows: "(i) The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall: (1)  Maintain records of the names of the taxpayers and qualified productions thereof claiming the tax credits under subsection (a); (2)  Obtain and total the aggregate amounts of all qualified production costs per qualified production and per qualified production per taxable year; (3)  Provide a letter to the director of taxation specifying the amount of the tax credit per qualified production for each taxable year that a tax credit is claimed and the cumulative amount of the tax credit for all years claimed; [and] (4)  Publish on its website the names of the qualified productions and the amount of tax credits certified per qualified production per filing year; and [(4)] (5) Submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session detailing the non-aggregated qualified production costs that form the basis of the tax credit claims and expenditures, itemized by taxpayer, in a redacted format to preserve the confidentiality and that shall include the dollar amount claimed, name of company, and name of the qualified production of the taxpayers claiming the credit." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act, upon its approval, shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________